apertium-cat.cat.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<!--
	Dictionary:
	Sections: 4
	Entries: 40352
	Sdefs: 69
	Paradigms: 557
	Last processed by: apertium-dixtools equiv-paradigms apertium-es-ca.ca.dix apertium-es-ca.ca.dix2

-->
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>·ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâäçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzŀl</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="detnt" /> 
    <sdef n="predet" /> 
    <sdef n="atn" /> 
    <sdef n="enc" /> 
    <sdef n="pro" /> 
    <sdef n="tn" /> 
    <sdef n="acr" /> 
    <sdef n="loc" /> 
    <sdef n="ant" /> 
    <sdef n="al" /> 
    <sdef n="n" /> 
    <sdef n="np" /> 
    <sdef n="adj" /> 
    <sdef n="f" /> 
    <sdef n="m" /> 
    <sdef n="mf" /> 
    <sdef n="sg" /> 
    <sdef n="pl" /> 
    <sdef n="adv" /> 
    <sdef n="preadv" /> 
    <sdef n="pr" /> 
    <sdef n="prn" /> 
    <sdef n="rel" /> 
    <sdef n="nn" /> 
    <sdef n="an" /> 
    <sdef n="aa" /> 
    <sdef n="ind" /> 
    <sdef n="itg" /> 
    <sdef n="det" /> 
    <sdef n="dem" /> 
    <sdef n="def" /> 
    <sdef n="cnjcoo" /> 
    <sdef n="cnjsub" /> 
    <sdef n="cnjadv" /> 
    <sdef n="nt" /> 
    <sdef n="vaux" /> 
    <sdef n="vbser" /> 
    <sdef n="vbhaver" /> 
    <sdef n="vblex" /> 
    <sdef n="vbmod" /> 
    <sdef n="inf" /> 
    <sdef n="ger" /> 
    <sdef n="pp" /> 
    <sdef n="pri" /> 
    <sdef n="ifi" /> 
    <sdef n="p1" /> 
    <sdef n="p2" /> 
    <sdef n="p3" /> 
    <sdef n="pii" /> 
    <sdef n="fti" /> 
    <sdef n="cni" /> 
    <sdef n="prs" /> 
    <sdef n="pis" /> 
    <sdef n="fts" /> 
    <sdef n="imp" /> 
    <sdef n="pos" /> 
    <sdef n="gen" /> 
    <sdef n="nom" /> 
    <sdef n="sp" /> 
    <sdef n="ref" /> 
    <sdef n="sup" /> 
    <sdef n="num" /> 
    <sdef n="ij" /> 
    <sdef n="sent" /> 
    <sdef n="cm" /> 
    <sdef n="lpar" /> 
    <sdef n="rpar" /> 
    <sdef n="lquest" /> 
    <sdef n="web" /> 
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
<pardef n="numeros">
  <e>       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="separa">
  <e>       <re>[.\?;:!]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="coma">
  <e>       <re>,</re><p><l></l><r><s n="cm"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="separ">
  <e>       <re>[¿¡]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lquest"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="paresq">
  <e>       <re>[\(\[]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lpar"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="emails">
  <e>       <re>[a-z.]+@[a-z.]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="web"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="urls">
  <e>       <re>(http://|https://|ftp://)?[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9](([\-_])?[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9])*(.[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9](([\-_])?[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9])*)*(.[a-z][a-z]|.aero|.asia|.biz|.cat|.com|.coop|.edu|.gov|.info|.int|.jobs|.mil|.mobi|.museum|.name|.net|.org|.pro|.tel|.travel)(/([áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9\-_\?=&amp;\*,]+(.[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9\-_\?=&amp;\*,]+)*/)*([áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9\-_\?=&amp;\*,]+(.[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9\-_\?=&amp;\*,]+)*)?)?</re><!--      <re>(www.|http://|https://|ftp://)[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9\-./]+[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9/]</re>      --> 
<p><l></l><r><s n="web"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="pardret">
  <e>       <re>[\)\]]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="rpar"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="ip">
  <e>       <re>(25[0-5]|2[0-4][0-9]|[0-1]?[0-9]?[0-9])(.(25[0-5]|2[0-4][0-9]|[0-1]?[0-9]?[0-9]))(.(25[0-5]|2[0-4][0-9]|[0-1]?[0-9]?[0-9]))(.(25[0-5]|2[0-4][0-9]|[0-1]?[0-9]?[0-9]))</re><p><l></l><r><s n="web"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="ex">
  <e>       <p><l>ex</l>        <r>ex</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ex-</l>       <r>ex</r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="S__anant-les">
  <e>       <p><l>-en</l>       <r>en<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>-hi</l>       <r>hi<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="S__anant-la">
  <e>       <p><l>'n</l>        <r>en<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>-hi</l>       <r>hi<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="S__anant-li">
  <e>       <p><l>'n</l>        <r>en<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>-hi</l>       <r>hi<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>-ho</l>       <r>ho<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="S__anant-l">
  <e>       <p><l>'en</l>       <r>en<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>'hi</l>       <r>hi<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="S__anant-m">
  <e>       <p><l>'hi</l>       <r>hi<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>'ho</l>       <r>ho<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="S__anant-me">
  <e>       <p><l>-les</l>      <r>el<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>-la</l>       <r>el<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>'ls</l>       <r>el<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>'l</l>        <r>el<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>'n</l>        <r>en<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>'ls</l>       <r>li<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>-li</l>       <r>li<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="S__anant-nos">
  <e>       <p><l>-les</l>      <r>el<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>-la</l>       <r>el<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>-els</l>      <r>el<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>-el</l>       <r>el<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>-en</l>       <r>en<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>-hi</l>       <r>hi<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>-ho</l>       <r>ho<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>-los</l>      <r>li<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>-li</l>       <r>li<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="S__anant-los">
  <e>       <p><l>-les</l>      <r>el<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>-la</l>       <r>el<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>-els</l>      <r>el<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>-el</l>       <r>el<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>-en</l>       <r>en<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>-hi</l>       <r>hi<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>-ho</l>       <r>ho<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>

<e lm="exrepública">     <par n="ex"/><i>repúbli</i><par n="acústi/ca__n"/></e>
<e lm="exdona" a="mireiafarrus"><par n="ex"/><i>don</i><par n="abell/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="exespia" a="mireiafarrus"><par n="ex"/><i>espi</i><par n="accionist/a__n"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="numeros"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="emails"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="urls"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="ip"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="separa"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="coma"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="paresq"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="pardret"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="separ"/></e>
